hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-la-x-liturgic.tex
.supé2r1ed
.supe2r1eff
.supé2r1eff
.supe2r1éff
.supe2r1eg
.supé2r1eg
.supe2r1el
.supe2r1él
.supe2r1em
.supe2r1ém
.supé2r1em
.supe3r2em.
.supe3r2emini.
.supe3r2émini.
.supe3r2emu
.supe3r2ému
.supe2r1en
.supé2r1en
.supe2r1én
.supe3r2ent
.supe3r2ént
.supe2r1er
.supé2r1er
.supe3r2er.
.supe3r2ere.
.supe3r2eris.
.supé3r2eris.
.supe2r1es
.supe2r1és
.súpe2r1es
.super3es.
.súper3es.
.supe2r1eu
.supe2r1ev
.supe2r1év
.supe2r1e2x3
.supé2r1e2x3
.supe2r3h
.supe3r4i.
.supé3r4i.
.supe2r3i2
.supé2r3i2
.supe2r1il
.supe2r1íl
.supe2r1im
.supe3r4i3mini.
.supe2r1in
.superin3i4i
.superin3i4í
.supe3r4i3o
.supé3r4i3o
.supe3r4i3ó
.supe2r1ir
.supe3r4is.
.supé3r4is.
.supe3r4i3u
.supé3r4i3u
.supe4r5i4ume
.supe2r1o2b1d
.supe2r1o2b3r
.supe2r1ó2b3r
.supe2r1o2b1u
.supe2r1o2b1ú
.supe2r1oc
.supe2r1óc
.supe2r1op
.supe3r2or
.supe4r3ord
.supe2r3s2c
.supe2r3s2p
.supe2r5s4t
.supé2r5s4t
.supe2r1sub3s2t
.supe2r3u
.supe2r3ú
.supe3r4um.
.supe3r2us.
.supra3s2c
.su5s4cr
.su3s2pec
.su3s2péc
.su4s3pen
.su4s3pén
.su3s2pic
.su3s2píc
.sú3s2pic
.su3s2pir
.su3s2pír
.t2
.ta2m3
.te2r1i2u
.terp2s
.te2r1un
.te2r1ún
.tetra3e2t
.tetra3g2n
.tetra3s2t
.te2ut
.the2o
.theo3g2n
.the3s2p
.the3s2t
.thi3s2b
.tra1i2a
.tra1i2e
.tra1ii
.tran2s
.trán2s
.transa2
.trans1a2b1e2
.trans1a2b1é2
.trans1a2b1i
.trans1a2b1í
.trans1act
.trans1a2d1
.trans1a2u
.tran3s2c
.trans1e
.tráns1e
.trans3ea
.tráns3ea
.tran3s2en
.transe2u
.tránse2u
.transe2ú
.trans3i
.trans3í
.tráns3i
.trans3íb
.transi3e
.transi3é
.tránsi3e
.tráns3i4i
.tran3s4il
.tran3s4íl
.trans1o2
.trans1u2
.tran3s2um
.tra2n1ue
.tri3en
.uni3an
.uni3án
.u3n2i3uscu
.ute2r3ui
.ve2l1ut
.x2
.z2
.za2i3eu
.zeu3g2m
a1
á1
a1e.
æ1
ǽ1
æ3a
æ3á
ǽ3a
æ3e
æ3é
ǽ3e
æ3i
æ3í
ǽ3i
æ3o
æ3ó
ǽ3o
æ3u
æ3ú
ǽ3u
ai2e
ai2é
ai4i
ai2o
ai2ó
ai6or.
a1is
a1ís
a3it.
á3it.
ai2u
ái2u
ai4unt.
a2m3ui
a2u
a5ú
á2u
a3um.
á3um.
a3us.
á3us.
2ax.
a2y
á2y
1b
2b.
2bb
2bd
2bh
2bj
b2l
2bm
2bn
2bp
b2r
2bs
b3s2t
2bt
bu3is.
bu3u
1c
4c.
2cc
2cd
c2h
2ch.
ch4l
4ch3m
cho3e
ch4r
4ch3t
ci3ent
ci3et
c4l
2cm
2cn
2cq
c6r
2cs
2ct
cu3
cui4ús
cu4lc
cú4lc
cu4ln
cú4ln
cu4lp
cú4lp
cu4mb
cu4nc
cu4nt
cu4rs
2cz
1d
2d.
d2æ.
d2am.
2dc
2dd
2df
2dg
2d3h
d4it.
2dl
2dm
2dn
2dp
2dq
d2r
2ds
du3u
4dv
2d3w
e1
é1
ë1
e3am.
é3am.
e5ant.
é5ant.
e3at.
é3at.
ei2a
ei2á
éi2a
ei2e
ei2é
éi2e
ei4i
ei2í
éi4i
ei4o
éi4o
e3is.
é3is.
ei2u
ei2ú
éi2u
ei4us.
éi4us.
e2l3ue
2em.
2es.
e2s3r
2et.
e5ú
2ex.
e3y
1f
2f.
2ff
f2l
2fn
f2r
2ft
1g
2g.
2gd
ge3n2ua
2gf
2gg
g2l
2gm
g2n
g4ne.
g2r
2gs
1h
2h.
h3m
2hp
2ht
hu2c5us
i1
í1
ï1
í5a
í5æ
í5e
i1el.
i3em.
i3ems.
i3ens.
i3ent.
i3es.
i3et.
í5i
i5i.
i3is.
i5it.
2i2m.
í5o
i2oi2u
i5or.
2i2s.
2i2t.
í5u
i3ud.
i3um.
i3unt.
i3ur.
i3us.
i2u2s3l
i2ú2s3l
i2u2s3v
i2ú2s3v
2i2x.
1j
1k
1l
4l.
langu5i.
langu5it.
langu5imus.
lángu5i.
lángu5it.
lángu5imus.
2lb
2lc
2ld
2lf
l3f2t
2lg
2lk
2ll
2lm
2ln
2lp
2lq
2lr
2ls
4lt
lu3i2a.
lú3i2a.
lu1un
lu1ún
4lv
4lz
1m
4m.
2mb
2mc
me4t3ips
2md
2mf
2ml
2mm
2mn
2mp
4mq
2mr
2ms
2mt
6mv
1n
2n.
2nb
2nc
nco3i
4nd
3ne.
2nf
2ng
ngu6a
ngu2á
ngu2æ
ngu2ǽ
ngu6e
ngu7era
ngu7eri
ngu8eris
ngu8eri.
ngu7ero.
ngu7erunt.
ngu7érunt.
ngu6é
ngu4i
ngu4i3a
ngu5iss
ngu5ist
ngu6isse.
ngu4í
ngu6o
ngu6ó
ngu6u
ngu6ú
ngú7a
ngú7æ
ngú7e
ngú7i
ngú7o
ngú7u
2nh
2nj
2nl
2nm
2nn
2np
2nq
2nr
2ns
n2s3f
n2s3m
2nt
nu3is.
4nv
2nx2
2nz
o1
ó1
œ1
oi2a
ói2a
oi2e
ói2e
oi2o
ói2o
oi2u
ói2u
o3um.
u2s3que
2ox.
o3y
1p
2p.
p2h
2ph.
pha3el
2php
ph3ph
2pht
p2l
2pn
3p2neu
po2t3en
po2t3én
po2t3er
po2t3ér
po2t3es
po2t3és
4pp
p2r
2ps
3p2sic
4p3t
3p2tr
2pz
1qu4
1qui3a
1qui3á
1qui3æ
1qui3ǽ
1qui3e
1qui3é
1qui3o
1qui3ó
1qui5u
1qui5ú
qu6o.
qu6u
qu6um.
1r
4r.
r2æ.
2rb
2rc
r2chm
2rd
2rf
2rg
r2h
ri3e.
r4iit.
2rl
2rm
2rn
2rp
2rq
4r3r
2rs
2rt
ru3is.
ru3it.
r4us.
4rv
2r1x
2rz
1s
4s.
2sb
2sc
3s2cæ
3s2cǽ
3s2ce
3s2cé
3s2ci
3s2cí
3s2cœ
3s2cy
3s2cý
2sd
2s3dem.
2sf
2sg
2sl
2sm
2sn
2sne.
2sp
2sq
2s3que.
2sr
4ss
s3se.
4st
2st.
s4t1k
s2t3l
2s3tn
2st3p
s2t3q
6s5tra.
6s5tri.
6s5tris.
6s5tro.
6s5trorum.
6s5trórum.
6s5trum.
s2t3s
s2t3t
su2b5s4tan
su3is.
2sv
1t
4t.
2tb
2tc
2td
2tf
2tg
t2h4
2th.
th4m
tho3s4t
thó3s4t
2th5p
2th5s
ti3n2ui
ti1o.
2t1íps
t2l
2tm
2tn
2tp
2tq
t4r
tru3um.
tru3us.
2ts
2tt
u1
ú1
ü1
ú5a
u3é
ú5e
u3e.
u3em.
u3en
u3es.
u3et.
ú5i
2ui.
u1i2a
u1i2e
u1i2é
u1i2o
u3is.
u3it.
ui2u
ui4us.
ú5o
u5o.
uo3u
uo3us
uo3ús
ú5u
u5um.
u5us.
2ux.
1v
1x
2x.
x2it.
2xq
2xt
x2u3it.
x2ú3it.
x2um.
x2us.
x2y
xy4s3t
y1
ý1
y3a
y3e
y3i
y3o
y3u
y3æ
y3y
2y.
2ys.
2yx.
1z
2z.
2zz
8́
}
